Massachusetts, session 194th, H110.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 130 of the general laws is hereby amended by adding the following
section:-
Section 37B. Lobstering Closure Mitigation Fund
(a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the Commonwealth, subject to
appropriation, a fund to be known as the Lobstering Closure Mitigation Fund to be administered
by the department of unemployment assistance.
(b) The purpose of the Fund shall be to provide financial assistance to lobstermen to
mitigate the financial impacts of fishing area closures due to protection of endangered marine
species as they work through the process of incorporation. For the purposes of this act, the term
“lobsterman” shall mean a holder of a commercial fisherman permit (lobster) as so appearing in
section 38 of this chapter that is deemed to be active and transferable by the director of marine
fisheries, and the term “trap” shall mean a lobster tag used to catch lobsters that is owned by and
of 3

licensed under and a lobsterman. Any lobsterman who is domiciled in Massachusetts shall be
eligible for weekly payments equal to one dollar per lobster trap tag per week. Eligibility for said
payments shall be available through January 1 and shall terminate on June 30 annually.
(c) There shall be credited to the Fund all amounts that are, by law, transferred or
authorized to be transferred thereto or directed to be deposited therein, and all amounts received
as gifts, grants, or contributions for the purposes of the Fund. Amounts credited to the Fund shall
not be subject to further appropriation and any money remaining in the Fund at the end of a fiscal
year shall revert to the General Fund.
(d) The director of the department shall report annually to the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on agriculture on income received into
the fund and sources of that income, any expenditure from the fund and their purposes, and fund
balances.
(e) The department shall promulgate regulations as necessary to implement the provisions
of this section, including, but not limited to, regulations pertaining to payment application and
disbursement procedures.
SECTION 2. The Secretary of State shall promulgate regulations to determine progress
toward incorporation made by all recipients no later than January 1 annually.
(a) Lobstermen who are found to have not made sufficient progress toward
incorporation after their first year of receiving closure mitigation payments shall not be eligible
for further payments until such progress is made.
of 3

(b) The Secretary of State shall host an annual information session for lobstermen to
educate recipients on the incorporation process and provide resources to assist with
incorporation.
SECTION 3. 3 fiscal years after the effective date of this act, the Fund shall be dissolved.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect immediately upon its passage.
of 3